Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2982.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Klagetoh Chapter; Navajo Nation; capital improvement projects The sum of $716,500 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo Nation for the Klagetoh Chapter for capital improvement projects.